District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-2413.09

Water and water service rates and charges.

Repealed.

History

Oct. 21, 1975, D.C. Law 1-23, title VII, § 701(a), 22 DCR 2114
repealed pursuant to § 302 of D.C. Law 11-111

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1525.
1973 Ed., § 1520d.

Editor's Notes

Repeal effective 90 days after meeting of Board: Section 304 of D.C. Law 11-111 repealed this section. However, § 601 of D.C. Law 11-111 provided that title III of the act shall apply 90 days after the initial meeting of the Board established by section 204 of the act.